Washington statutes.
RCW 14.12.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Airport hazard" means any structure or tree or use of land which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking-off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking-off of aircraft.

(2) "Airport hazard area" means any area of land or water upon which an airport hazard might be established if not prevented as provided in this chapter.

(3) "Airports" means any area of land or water designed and set aside for the landing and taking-off of aircraft and utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for such purposes.

(4) "Person" means any individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association or body politic, including the state and its political subdivisions, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

(5) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, town, port district or other municipal or quasi municipal corporation authorized by law to acquire, own or operate an airport.

(6) "Structure" means any object constructed or installed by a human being, including, but without limitation, buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission lines.

(7) "Tree" means any object of natural growth.

[ 2009 c 549 s 1006; 1945 c 174 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-15.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).